tools/hyphenators/patternbased/se_hyph.tex
.al2o
.amma3
.ani1
.ap2o
.ap2r
.ara1
.as3ta
.at2r
.álá1
.árá2
.ás3ka
.ás3ta
.bá1b
.bá1ž
.cat2
.cá3bu
.cá3m
.cás1
.ce1m
.co3li
.co1s
.ča1b
.ča3g
.ča1n
.čis1
.čo3li
.čo1m
.da3me
.da3ni
.dan3v
.da2s
.dá1ž
.djo1
.do3mi
.do3sa
.då1
.ebe2
.eid1
.eu1
.fa3se
.fá3ri
.ga3le
.ga3si
.ga1ž
.gá1j
.gi3na
.he3de
.id1j
.id1n
.ido1
.iko1
.ilo1
.imá2
.is3ka
.is2t
.it2r
.ja3li
.ja1m
.jod1
.ka3su
.ká3ri
.ke1l
.ki1l
.ko1d
.ku3la
.la3ba
.la3sa
.la3si
.la3su
.le3ra
.ma3na
.ma3ši
.má3ši
.mi3hu
.mo3sa
.na3si
.na2v
.neg1
.ngo2
.no3m
.og1
.ome2
.on1s
.or3ie
.pa3g
.pa1š
.pe1d
.po3li
.ra3ke
.re1g
.re3pr
.ru3ba
.sa2s
.sá3ri
.si1o
.sk2
.ski3b
.st2
.ša3lu
.ši3ra
.ško1
.šo1g
.ta3t
.ti1b
.tu3m
.uo1
.ur3ta
.vá1b
.ve3li
.vi3ha
.xt2
.øi1
.åk1
a1a
aal1
aa1m
1a2as
a2at
aa1v
a1á
aái1
aba2g
abá1l
abbá2
a1be
a2beh
abe1l
ab1m
abo1l
a2bui
a2buž
2ac
ace1b
ac1h
2ač
a1dad
a2dao
a2dat
a2d1av
adá1ž
addá2
a1dem
aden2
a2dii
a2din
a2div
ad1j
admi1
a2d1n
adno2
a2duv
1adv
ađe2
ađi2
a1ea
aeas1
a1e1d
a2ei
aei2n
aek1
aeks2
a2em
a1er
aes1
aesk2
a1eu
a1ev
2a1f
afa1
a2fr
a2gač
a2gag
a2gam
a2gan
a2gao
aga2r
aga3sa
aga3si
a2gav
a2geb
age2n
a2geš
a2get
age3ži
agga2
aggu2
agi3er
agi1n
a2gis
a1g2l
ag2no
a2g1r
a2gut
a2guv
a1gü
ag2v
a1hal
a3hala
a1har
a1hav
ahča1
a1hed
a2hem
a2het
a2hi
ahká2
a1ho
a2huv
ai2a
ai1b2
a2id
ai2do
ai1gŋ
ai1go
a1ij
ai1la
aila3s
ai1le
ai1li
a2in.
a1ind
a2ine
ai1no
a2i1sa
ai2si
aiti1
a1j
aja2
ajá2
ajes3
aji1b
ajje2
a1ka
aka1d
ak1ád
akca2
2ake
ake2m
a1ki
ak2l
a1ko
ak1r
ak2rá
aksa2
aks2t
a1ku
1akv
a1la
a2lab
a2l1ag
al1ak
a2lam
a2lao
a1lá
alá2l
alá2m
1alár
alás1
al3duh
al3dut
a2lep
1alf
a1li2m
a1lis
a2l1j
alká1
al1oa
alo1b
al1tr
al2z
a2ma.
a2mab
a2mag
a2mam
ama1n
am1br
ame1b
ame1d
ame1l
ami1b
amii3d
amis2
am2na
am2o
ampo3l
am2ta
a1mä
a1nad
a1nag
an1ar
a1nas
ana3sa
an3ask
aná1d
a2n1áj
ance2
anda3l
a1ne.
a1ne2l
a2nen
a1nes
a1neš
a1net
an2ga
a1ni.
an1j
an2ju
anná2
ano2v
an2sk
an3sta
an2tr
aŋká2
a1o
ao2a
aois2
ao1li
ao1si
aos1t
aote1
aper2
a1pl
apma3h
ap1oa
appo3h
a1pr
a1psy
apul2
a1ra
a3rad
ara2l
a1rá
ará2d
arca1
ar1da
ar3ded
a1reb
are3li
a1re2n2
a1rer
aria2
a3rih
ari1o
ariu2
ar2o
ar1oa
aro2n
arra2
ar1sk
ar1ta
artá1
a3ru
a1sai
a1sas2
asa3sa
asá2
a2s1ád
asá3l
asán2
as1ek
ase1l
as3ha
as1he
as1hi
asia2
asi2l
a2siš
as1j
2aska
as1ki
as3kot
a1sku
asma2
asmme3
as2mu
as2nu
as3ta.
as3tao
as3tar
a3staš
astá2
as3tás
asti3l
a2stu
asu2
a1suv
aša1s
a1šá
aš1áh
aška2
aš1l
a1šoh
aš2te
aš2ti
aš1tu
a1šu
a2šuh
a2šus
a2šut
a1ta
ata2r
ata1s
atá2
at1ál
atá1n
ate3g
ate1l
at1ev
at3h
atit1
atni2
a2toi
ato1s
a2tr
ats2k
attá2
a1tu
au1b
au1d
au2e
au2la
aul2t
au2n2
au1sa
au1š
aušu1
auto1
a1uv
avat2
a1ve
aven2
avi2d
2aviđ
1avii
a1vir
avi2s
a1ví
avva2
a1vå2
aw2
a2wai
ax1
a1y
ay2a
a1zo1
a2ža.
a2žab
a2žan
aža3sa
a2žaš
a2žat
a2žaž
a1žo
á1áh
á1áš
ába1
ábá2
á1be
ábe1b
á2beh
ábe2l
ábe2n
ábe1s
áb1m
ábmo2
áb2o2
ábo1l
ábor2
ádá2
ádda2
ádde2
á1deh
á2det
ádi2
á2din
á2dit
á2div
á2d1j
ádju2
ád1n
ád2r
á1dus
á2duv
áđá2
áđe2
áđi1b
á1e
áfas2
á1fe
áfi2
áfo2
áfrá2
ága2l
ágá2n
áge2n
áges2
áge1ž
ági3d
á2gin
á2had
á1hag
á1hah
á2ham
á1hus
ái1b2m
ái1bu
á2id
ái1d2n
ái2do
ái3duv
ái1la
á1ilb
ái1li
ái1lu
áipa1
1áir
ái1ro
ái1sa
áis2t
ái3stá
ái1tá
áiva1
á3ja
á1já
áje2
á1ji
áj1il
á3jo2
áj1ov
á1ju
á1ka1
ákka2
ákká3h
ák1r
1ákš
ákto2
á1la
á3lah
á3lá
álá2s
1álb
ál1di
ál3din
á2le.
á1le1k
á1lem
á1leš
á2let
áli1d
áli2s
á2lit
ál1j
2áll
állá2
álle1
álli2
ál1oa
álo1b
álo2n
á1lum
á1lup
á1lus
á1luv
álvi2
áma2g
ámá2h
ámá2l
ámá2n
á2me.
á1mea
á2met
ám2i
ámi1b
ámi2d
ámi1t2
ámo2n
ámot2
ámu1b
á1na
á3nač
án2á
áná2l
á1ne1b
á1neg
á1ne1j
á1nek
á1nel
á1ne2m
á1ne2n
á1nes
á1neš
á1než
án2gu
á1nii
á2nis
án1j
á1no
ánse2
ánu1h
áŋa1h
á1ŋe
áŋi1
á1o
áp1
ápmá2
á1pr
á1ra
ára2d
ára2l
ára3sa
á1rá
árá1h
ár1di
ár2do
ár1du
áre1g
á1res
árga2
ári2
á2rin
á2ris2
árko1
ár1oa
árre3h
árro3h
ár1ta
á1ru
árus2
á1sag
ása2l
á1sas2
á1saž
á1seh
á1sem
á1seš
á1sež
ás1h
ási1h
á1sin
ásis2
ás3kan
ás1ki
ás1ko
ás3kun
ás3kuv
ás2mu
áso1
ás1om
áso2n
á2st
ás3ta.
ás3tah
ás3tar
ás3tus
ás3tuv
ás1uv
á2šam
á1šen
2áši
ášša2
áš1t
ášu1b
á1šut
át1h
á2t1o
áto1s
á2tr
áttá2
átti2
á1ŧ
ávár1
ávás2
ávdá2
á1ve
á1vi2
ávis2
áv2ku
2áž
áža1s
á2že
á2ži
á1žo
ã1oi
ã1ol
ã1on
1ba1b
ba2ba
1bac
1bad
ba2de
ba1e
1bag
ba3ga
1bah
1bai
1baj
1bak
1bal
1bam
1ban
ba2nu
1bar
1bas
ba2se
1ba2š
1bat
1bav
1baž
ba1ža
1bá
bá1da
bá1di
bá1du
bá1go
bá1je
bá2ji
bá2nu
bá2ri
bá1sa
bá1si
bás3ki
bá1z
bá1ža
2b1b
b3ba
bba2s
bbá1g
bbá2n
bbá2s
bbes2
bble2
b2b1oa
bbo2s2
bb2r
b3bu
bbu2g
bbu2l
bbus2
2b1d
b2dr
b2e
1be.
2beah
1beai
1beal
1bec
2beču
1bed
be1di
be2gi
1beha
be3has
1behi
1bei
beki1
1bel
be3lač
be3laž
be3leb
be3lii
bello3
be2ma
be2mo
1beo
1ber
ber2g
1bes
be3sii
1beš
1bet
1bev
2b1g
1b2i
bib1m
bid1
bi2e
bi1li
bi2me
bi1ne
bing2
bin1j
2binl
bi1oh
bi1ro
bi2se
bi2si
bis2t
bi1tá
b1j
2bk
b1kj
2bl
b1la
b2laš
b1le
b3le.
blei2
b1li
bma1b
bma2h
b2man
bmá2b
b1me
bme2m
bme2n
bmes2
bmil2
bmi3la
bmis2
bmo2
bmo1a
bmos2
b2mov
bmu2m
bn2
bnp1
1bo
bo2ga
bo2gi
bo2kl
b2ol
bo3lač
bo3laš
bo3laž
b2om
bo2ma
bo3net
bon1j
bor2g
b1ori
bo3sas
bo2se
b2ou
box2
bozos3
bpo1
b1r
2bra
bra1d
bra2l
brat2
brii1
br2j
1b2ro
bs2á
b1se
b1si
b1s2k
bs1t2
b1s2ti
b1su
bu2d
1buđ
bu1go
1buh
1buk
1bul
bu2ma
bu2mi
bu2mo
1buo
bur1t
1bu1si
1busk
1busv
1buv
b1v
1by
by1h
by2n
byna1
by1o
b1ža
bø1t
bå2
2b'
1ca
ca2gi
ca3hal
cala2
ca2m
ca2mo
ca1na
can1v
ca2sa
ca2se
ca2si
cas2t
1cá
cá1di
cá1ha
cá3had
cá2j
cá2l
cá1ri
cás2k
cá1z
c1b
c1c
cca2l
cce1b
cco2d
c2cr
ccu2m
cd1a
cdá3si
c1de
cd1o
1c2e
ce2ma
ce2mo
ce1si
ce2su
cey1
c1g
c2ha
chei2
ch2l
ch2m
ch1n
c1ho
ch1oa
chon2
ch2r
c1hu
1c2i
ci1be
cib1m
ci2de
ci2r
ci2si
cis2t
c1k
c3ka
ckar2
cká2
c3ki
ck1j
c2k1l
ck2li
c2kn
c2k1oa
c2k1r
c2lo
c1m
c1ne2
1co
2c1oa
coa1g
co1d
co3dat
co2du
c2oh
c2om
co2ma
co2mi
core2
cos2t
cot2t
cpos2
cr2
c1ra2
c1re
crna2
c1ro
c1st
c1t
c2tii
ctio2
c2tr
1c2u
cu2d
cu2l
cu2me
cu2mo
cus2t
cuta2
c1v
1c2y
cya1
cæ1
1ča
ča2d
ča3dal
ča3luv
ča2ma
ča1n2j
čan1v
ča2sk
čava1
1čá
čá1ba
čá3le.
čá1lu
čá2ma
čá2r
č1č
ččá2l
čče1b
ččo1b
1če
čea1b
če3jed
če2ma
če1še
če2šu
čeža1
1či
či1be
či2h
či3lao
či3lat
či1no
či3ra.
či2ri
či2s
čis2t
1čo
čo2a
2čoi
čo2mo
čo2n
čo2re
čo2ri
čo1ro
čos2t
1ču
ču1be
ču2li
ču2m
ču2mo
ču1sa
ču1se
čus2t
1dac
da3dan
1dade
da3dea
1dag
1d2ah
da3hal
da3he.
1dai
da1in
da1is
1daj
1dak
1dale2
2dall
1dame
1dami
dam2l
1dana
1daná
3danba
1dand
1dane
1danh
1dani
1dank
1danl
2dan1o
dano3l
2danv
3danvá
1dao
1dap
1da2r
dara1
1das
da1sa
dasá1
da2sk
1daš
da3šea
1datb
1datk
1datl
1datm
1datp
2datt
1datv
1dav
1daž
1dá
dá1bu
dá1du
dá1hu
dá1j
dál3da
dá2n1á
dá1ne
dá3nin
dá2nu
dá2ra
dá3sus
dá1ša
d1ávi
d1b
db2r
2d1č
2d1d2
dda2s
dda2š
ddá2n
dde1b
dde3mu
ddet1
ddi2d
d2dir
ddi2s
dd2j
d2dn
d2d1oa
ddus2
d2e
2dea
3deaj
de3ati
de2ba
1debe
1dede
1dee
1dehe
1deik
1dej
1dek
dek3s
1del
1deme
de2mo
1demu
1den
de1n2j
1deo
2dep
1der
de2ru
1desi
de2so
de1st
de2t
1deta
1detá
1detb
det2l
2detn
de1t2r
2dett
1dev
2d1g
d1ha
dha2m
d1he
d1ho
d1hu
1di.
1d2ia
1diá1
1dib
dib1m
di3bui
1dic
di2di
1diđ
2die
1dif
1dig
1dih
d2ii
1diij
1diim
1dik
1dil
dill1
di3luv
1dim
di2ma
1dina
1diná
1dine
1ding
1dini
1dio
di1od
di1ok
di2ol
dio2n
di2os
1dir
dir1d
di1ri
1dise
1disk
1dism
dis2t
2diš
1dite
1divš
d1ja
djá2n
djás2
2djáv
d1je
dje1g
djis2
djo2m
djo2n
dju2l
d1k2
dkt1
2d1l
d2lj
d1m
dma2l
dmi1n
dmur1
dn2a
1dna.
1dna1g
2dnai
d2nal
1dnao
dn2á
dne2m
dni2n
dnis2
d1n2j
d1no
dno2d
dnos2
dnu1b
d2nug
d2nul
dn1ø
1do
2d1oah
doba2
2doe
2d1olg
do2mo
d2on
do2r
do3sao
do3saž
dos2t
dot2t
3dovi
2d1p2
d1r2
drat2
dre1g
d2res
2ds
d1sa
d1si
ds2j
d1s2k
d1s2p
d1st2
d1š
2dt2
1du.
1dub
du1be
1duc
1due
1dug
1d2ui
1duk
1dul
du1me
1dumo
1dun
1duo
2dup
1dur
du2ri
1du1sa
1dusb
1duse
1dusg
1dusj
1dusk
1dusm
1duso
1duss
1dusv
3duš
1dutk
1duva
3duvva
3duvvá
2d1v
dvi2g
1dy
dy1n
dyt2
2d2z
dza1
døle1
d1øy
1đa
đa1b
đa2l2
đal1d
đa2le
đa2mi
đa2mo
đa1mu
đa2s
đas2t
đaš1t
1đá
đá2b
đá2ha
đá2j
đá2l
đá2mi
đ1ba
đ1be
đ1b2m
2đ1đ
đđá2
đđe1h
1đe
đe1a
đe1d
đe2da
đe2de
đe2du
đe3hal
đe2he
đe2ma
đe2mo
2đg
đga2l
đgá2
đge2
đge1j
đgi2
đ1g2ŋ
đ1go2
1đi
đi2d
đi1he
đi1hi
đi1hu
đi1la
đi2ma
đi2me
đir2
đi2s
đis2t
2đj
đ1ja
đ1já
đ1je
đje1j
đ1ji
đ1jo
đjo1š
đ1ju
2đk
2đm
2đŋ
1đo
đo1be
đo2g
đo2m
đo2ma
đo2mo
đo2n
đos2t
đo2t
2đp
1đu
đui1d
đu2le
đu2ma
đu2s
2đv
đva1s
đ1ve
đve1b
đ1vi
đvi1b
ðu2
ður2
ea1ba
e3ager
ea1go
e2ai
eai3dn
ea3la
eal1d
ea1le
ea1li
ea1lu
ea1m
ea3ma
ea1n2a
ea1ne
e1ano
1eanu
e2ar
ea3ra
ear3da
ea1ro
ea1sa
ea1se
eas3ka
eas3ta
ea1šá
ea1šo
2eat
e3ativ
e1atu
e1á
eá1l
e2baž
e2beh
eb1m
ebor2
e1bu
e1bø
e2ca
ecco3h
eck2
e1dal
eddo2
ede2g
e2d1j
ed1n
eđa1
eđá1
eđđe2
e1e
ee1la
ee2m
ee2n2
ee2o1
eepe2
ee2r
ee1s2
efá1l
e1fe
e1fj
e2ga
ega1h
ega3sa
egá1l
egda2
egga2
eggo3s
e2gin
e2gl
e2g2n
ego1b
egoi3
eg2r
e3gu
e1gü
e2han
e1hav
ehá1
e2hes
ehká2
eh2l
e1ho
eh2r
ei2a
ei1b2m
ei1da
eide2
ei1di
ei1d2n
eid1s2
e1ie
eie2n2
eif2
ei1la
ei1le
ei1li
eilo2
ei2m
ei1na
ei1ni
e1inv
1ei1r
ei1sa
eis2k
ei3ske
e1ja
eja2l
e1já
e1jii
e1jis
e1jo
e1jug
e1juo
eka1n
eká1
e2ke
e1kis
ekko2
e1k2l
ekla1
e1ko
ek1r
ekso2
ekso3s
2ekt
e1ku1
ek1v
ela2l
e3lame
ela3sa
e1lá
elbu1
el1di
el1du
e1leh
el1ek
elen2
eles1
e1leš
e1le1ž
el1j
ellá2
ello2
el1oa
elo3hu
el1uv
emát2
embe1
e2me.
e2met
emi1n
e3mit
e2moš
e1mum
e2må
2e1na
en1ap
ena2s
e2n1á
en2ál
enda2
endi2
e1ne
e2nea
e1ni
enia2
eni1n
en1j
en2kr
2enn
en1oj
eno1m
en1os
en1sk
en1st
ent2s1
enu2m
en1v
e1o
eo2a
eo1b
eo1d
eo1li
eo2n
eo1p
eo3re
eos2
eosk2
eot2
ep2o
eppa2
eppo2
e1qe
e1r
e2rab
e2rag
er1ak
e2rao
1erar
era3sa
e2r1ár
erda2
er1di
er1dr
e2rea
ere2g
ere2h
ere2n
e2rep
e3reš
e3ret1
er2ga
e2rin
e2riv
erke2
erko2
2erm
ern2
er2o
e2r1oa
ero3li
erpe2
erre2
erro2
er1sk
er1ta
erza1
er1ö
e2sal
e1sam
e1sas
e1sav
esá2r
e1seš
eset2
e1sež
es1ib
esid1
es1il
es3int
e2sis
e2sit
es1j
e1s2ká
es1ki
es1ko
e3skuv
es1ok
es1or
esso2
e2ste
e2sti
e2sto2
e1str
e2stu
e1su
e1sø
e1šan
eš1á
e2še.
eš1lá
eššo2
eš1ta
eš2te
eš2ti
eš3tuv
e1šu
e1ta
e2tai
eta1š
e2tat
et1av
e2t1á
et2áŋ
et2ár
etá1š
e2t1áv
et1h
etko2
1etni
eto1b
eto1d
eto1s
e2tr
et2sk
et3t2
1e1tu
et2z
e1ŧu
eu1i2
eu1k
e1um.
e1uma
e1ume
e1umi
e1umm
eu1n
eupo1
evat2
e1ve
evh1
e2viđ
evi1e
evi2s
evvo2
e1vy
e1vä
ex1a
ex2ai
e1y
ey2n
eyna1
eys2
eyt2
e2že
e1žo
e1ä
é1a
éa2l
éask2
éat2
éc2
é1dé
é1l
émi1
é1op
é1ra
é1ri
éto1
é1u1n
1fa
fa3dat
fa2ga
fa2gi
fa2gu
fa2ka
fa2la
fa2li
fa1ro
fasá1
fas1h
fa2sk
fa1ši
fa2u
1fá
fábe2
fá3dat
fá2j
fá1mu
fá1ne
fá2ra
fá2ri
fá1ro
fá1ši
1fea2m
fe1b
fe1ii
fe1in
1fel
1fé
2f1f2
ffá2l
ffi2r
ffis2
ffo2l
1fi
fia2n
fias2
fi1b
fid1n
fi1du
fi2ev
fi1le
fi2me
fi1na
fi3ret
fi2ri
1fjo
fl2
1f2la
f1lá
f1le
f1lii
f2lo
flo1n
f1lu
3fluer
fni2
1fo
fo1be
fol2
fo1li
fo2ma
fo1na
fo1ne
fo1nj
fo1ru
fo1st
f1ra
fra2l
fra1s
f1rá
frá1s
fre1n
f1ri
frog1
2fs
f1se
f1s2t
2f1t
1fu2
fu3luv
fu1no
fus2t
fu1š
2fv
1fy
fy1m
fy2n
fy1s
1ga
ga2ba
2gabb
ga3but
3gac
g2ad
ga3dit
ga2ga
gai2n
3gal
ga2ma
ga1mu
ga2na
ga2nu
gar2d
ga2ri
ga3sam
ga2sá
ga2se
gask2
3gasv
3gašá
3gašu
3gati
gat2t
2gažž
1g2á
gá2de
gái3da
gá2ji
gála3s
gá2ma
gá1ni
gá2nu
gá1re
gá1ri
gá1sa
gá3sam
gá1ša
gáva2
2g1b
gbá1
gbor2
2gč
2g1d
g2d2r
1ge
2geam
2geas2
3geaš
2geat
ge1b
ge2ba
2gedd
2gedj
2gei
ge3jea
ge3las
ge2ma
gen1o
2gep
3ger
ge2ra
ge2ro
ge1se
ge1u2
2gežž
gfos2
2g1g
gga1b
gga2l
gga2s
ggá2l
ggá2n
ggá2r
ggá2s
g2gl
ggo2m
ggo2n
gg2r
ggu2h
ggu2l
g1h
gha2m2
gha1n
ghat2
gh2k
gh2l
1g2i
gi1be
gi1bu
gi2da
gi2de
gid1n
gi3eri
gi1lu
gi1nj
3gi1o
3gir
gir1d
gi2re
gi2ri
3gisd
gi2si
2giš
2givč
2g1j
g1k
g1l
g2laš
g2laž
g2lás
gle1
glia2
g2ly
2g1m
g2mo
g1n
g2ná1
2gne
gne2l
gnes1
gnos1
g1ŋ
gŋá2
gŋe2m
1go.
go2a
1goab
1goal
1goar
1g1oas
1gob
1god
1gog
1goha
go2he
go2hi
1gohp
go2hu
go2in
goi2s
1goj
1gok
3g2ol
go3laš
1gom
go2me
go2mo
1gon
go3naš
go3nat
go3nav
go3naž
go1ne
gong2
1goo
1gor
gor2d
go1ru
1gos
go2sa
go3saž
go2se
go2sk
go2st
1goš
3got
1gov
1gož
gp2
g1pr
g1qi
1gr
2gr.
3grá
g2rád
g2rám
2g1ri
2g1ro
gro1i
2g1s
g2sf
gs2k
gs2m
gs2p
gs2t
g2su
g2sø
g2t
gt2s
1gu
3gul
gu2mo
gu3nat
3guo
gur2l
gu1sa
g1v
gv1o
g1ya
g1ye
gy1n
2gä
g1äl
2gø
gøs1
g1øy
2hab
3habl
ha2d
3hagad
3hagai
3hagas
3hagaš
3hagat
3hagaž
ha3ha.
1hahi
1hahk
hakk1
1hal.
1hali
1ham.
1hama
1hame
1hamm
2hamo
ha2na
1han1i1
1hanl
1hann
1hanš
hara1
ha1ro
1has.
1ha1sa
1hasb
1has1e
1hasg
1haso
1hass
1hašt
3hatb
1hatč
1hatd
1hatg
1hatj
1hatm
1hato
3hatti
1hatv
1haw
1há
há1j
há2ma
há3me
há1ne
há1se2
há1ša
há1še
há1ši
h1b2
hca2n
hcá2
h2c1áh
hci2b
hci2l
hco1b
hco2d
hcu2
2hč
hča2l
hčá2
hčás3t
hččá2
hčo1h
